Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 2. PROTECTION OF LABORERS

SUBTITLE E. REGULATION OF CERTAIN OCCUPATIONS

CHAPTER 93. TEMPORARY EMPLOYMENT SERVICES

Sec. 93.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Temporary employee" means an individual hired for a temporary employment service.

(2) "Temporary employment service" means a person who employs individuals for the purpose of assigning those individuals to the clients of the service to support or supplement the client's workforce in a special work situation, including:

(A) an employee absence;

(B) a temporary skill shortage;

(C) a seasonal workload; or

(D) a special assignment or project.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 574, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 93.002. PROHIBITION. A temporary employment service may not deny an application for, or placement in, a position of employment to an individual for the sole reason that the individual has not earned a high school diploma or graduate equivalency diploma unless the position of employment or the client requires that credential to perform the duties of the position.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 574, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 93.003. NO CAUSE OF ACTION. This chapter does not create a private cause of action for any person or class of persons.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 574, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 93.004. WORKERS' COMPENSATION INSURANCE COVERAGE. (a) A certificate of insurance coverage showing that a temporary employment service maintains a policy of workers' compensation insurance constitutes proof of workers' compensation insurance coverage for the temporary employment service and the client of the temporary employment service with respect to all employees of the temporary employment service assigned to the client. The state or a political subdivision of the state shall accept a certificate of insurance coverage described by this section as proof of workers' compensation coverage under Chapter 406.

(b) For workers' compensation insurance purposes, if a temporary employment service elects to obtain workers' compensation insurance, the client of the temporary employment service and the temporary employment service are subject to Sections 406.034 and 408.001.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), an employee's election under Section 406.034(b) made with respect to the temporary employment service applies to any client of the temporary employment service, and the employee may not make a separate election under that section with respect to the client.

(d) If an employee elects to retain a common-law right of action under Section 406.034(b) with respect to the temporary employment service, that election does not apply to a client of that temporary employment service if the client is not subject to Section 406.034.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 321 (H.B. 1762), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.